dictionaries/tr/index.aff
FLAG num
SFX 768 N 1
SFX 768 0 dür .

SFX 769 N 1
SFX 769 0 nün .

SFX 770 N 1
SFX 770 0 sü .

SFX 771 N 1
SFX 771 0 yü .

SFX 772 N 1
SFX 772 0 yüm .

SFX 773 N 1
SFX 773 0 yüz .

SFX 774 N 1
SFX 774 0 ümü .

SFX 775 N 1
SFX 775 0 dandı .

SFX 776 N 1
SFX 776 0 dü .

SFX 777 N 1
SFX 777 0 üm .

SFX 778 N 1
SFX 778 0 üz .

SFX 779 N 1
SFX 779 0 dılarsa .

SFX 780 N 1
SFX 780 0 dıysak .

SFX 781 N 1
SFX 781 0 dıysam .

SFX 782 N 1
SFX 782 0 dadır .

SFX 783 N 1
SFX 783 0 dakiler .

SFX 784 N 1
SFX 784 0 dakilerle .

SFX 785 N 1
SFX 785 0 daysa .

SFX 786 N 1
SFX 786 0 talar .

SFX 787 N 1
SFX 787 0 taydı .

SFX 788 N 1
SFX 788 0 lardadır .

SFX 789 N 1
SFX 789 0 lardakinden .

SFX 790 N 1
SFX 790 0 lardakinin .

SFX 791 N 1
SFX 791 0 lardaydı .

SFX 792 N 1
SFX 792 0 lardaysa .

SFX 793 N 1
SFX 793 0 larımdır .

SFX 794 N 1
SFX 794 0 larımmış .

SFX 795 N 1
SFX 795 0 larınaysa .

SFX 796 N 1
SFX 796 0 larındaki .

SFX 797 N 1
SFX 797 0 larındaydı .

SFX 798 N 1
SFX 798 0 larındaysa .

SFX 799 N 1
SFX 799 0 larınızda .

SFX 800 N 1
SFX 800 0 larınızdaki .

SFX 801 N 1
SFX 801 0 larınızdır .

SFX 802 N 1
SFX 802 0 larınızla .

SFX 803 N 1
SFX 803 0 larınla .

SFX 804 N 1
SFX 804 0 larıysa .

SFX 805 N 1
SFX 805 0 ydım .

SFX 806 N 1
SFX 806 0 ydınız .

SFX 807 N 1
SFX 807 0 mışsak .

SFX 808 N 1
SFX 808 0 mışsan .

SFX 809 N 1
SFX 809 0 nınsa .

SFX 810 N 1
SFX 810 0 nızdır .

SFX 811 N 1
SFX 811 0 salardı .

SFX 812 N 1
SFX 812 0 sana .

SFX 813 N 1
SFX 813 0 saydınız .

SFX 814 N 1
SFX 814 0 sınaydı .

SFX 815 N 1
SFX 815 0 sındadır .

SFX 816 N 1
SFX 816 0 sındaysa .

SFX 817 N 1
SFX 817 0 sıymışçasına .

SFX 818 N 1
SFX 818 0 yacaktık .

SFX 819 N 1
SFX 819 0 yacaktım .

SFX 820 N 1
SFX 820 0 mıştın .

SFX 821 N 1
SFX 821 0 mıştınız .

SFX 822 N 1
SFX 822 0 ur .

SFX 823 N 1
SFX 823 0 sındansa .

SFX 824 N 1
SFX 824 0 sün .

SFX 825 N 1
SFX 825 0 mıştılar .

SFX 826 N 1
SFX 826 0 lardık .

SFX 827 N 1
SFX 827 0 lardım .

SFX 828 N 1
SFX 828 0 lardın .

SFX 829 N 1
SFX 829 0 lardınız .

SFX 830 N 1
SFX 830 0 larımızdı .

SFX 831 N 1
SFX 831 0 larındadır .

SFX 832 N 1
SFX 832 0 larındayız .

SFX 833 N 1
SFX 833 0 larındayken .

SFX 834 N 1
SFX 834 0 larız .

SFX 835 N 1
SFX 835 0 larken .

SFX 836 N 1
SFX 836 0 rlardı .

SFX 837 N 1
SFX 837 0 rlarken .

SFX 838 N 1
SFX 838 0 rlarmış .

SFX 839 N 1
SFX 839 0 rlarsa .

SFX 840 N 1
SFX 840 0 larmışçasına .

SFX 841 N 1
SFX 841 0 larsak .

SFX 842 N 1
SFX 842 0 larsam .

SFX 843 N 1
SFX 843 0 larsan .

SFX 844 N 1
SFX 844 0 larsanız .

SFX 845 N 1
SFX 845 0 larsınız .

SFX 846 N 1
SFX 846 0 sanıza .

SFX 847 N 1
SFX 847 0 saydın .

SFX 848 N 1
SFX 848 0 eceksin .

SFX 849 N 1
SFX 849 0 iyorlarsa .

SFX 850 N 1
SFX 850 0 yacakken .

SFX 851 N 1
SFX 851 0 yacakmışçasına .

SFX 852 N 1
SFX 852 0 yacaksanız .

SFX 853 N 1
SFX 853 0 yacaktınız .

SFX 854 N 1
SFX 854 0 sunlar .

SFX 855 N 1
SFX 855 0 zlarsa .

SFX 856 N 1
SFX 856 0 yasın .

SFX 857 N 1
SFX 857 0 selerdi .

SFX 858 N 1
SFX 858 0 senize .

SFX 859 N 1
SFX 859 0 ndır .

SFX 860 N 1
SFX 860 0 takiler .

SFX 861 N 1
SFX 861 0 takilere .

SFX 862 N 1
SFX 862 0 takileri .

SFX 863 N 1
SFX 863 0 takini .

SFX 864 N 1
SFX 864 0 tasın .

SFX 865 N 1
SFX 865 0 taydılar .

SFX 866 N 1
SFX 866 0 taydım .

SFX 867 N 1
SFX 867 0 tayım .

SFX 868 N 1
SFX 868 0 taymış .

SFX 869 N 1
SFX 869 0 taysalar .

SFX 870 N 1
SFX 870 0 tırlar .

SFX 871 N 1
SFX 871 0 esiniz .

SFX 872 N 1
SFX 872 0 irliğine .

SFX 873 N 1
SFX 873 0 irliğinin .

SFX 874 N 1
SFX 874 0 iyorken .

SFX 875 N 1
SFX 875 0 urken .

SFX 876 N 1
SFX 876 0 lardansa .

SFX 877 N 1
SFX 877 0 larımızdaki .

SFX 878 N 1
SFX 878 0 maymış .

SFX 879 N 1
SFX 879 0 mıdır .

SFX 880 N 1
SFX 880 0 ımdan .

SFX 881 N 1
SFX 881 0 ımı .

SFX 882 N 1
SFX 882 0 ımın .

SFX 883 N 1
SFX 883 0 ımız .

SFX 884 N 1
SFX 884 0 ımıza .

SFX 885 N 1
SFX 885 0 ımızla .

SFX 886 N 1
SFX 886 0 ındaki .

SFX 887 N 1
SFX 887 0 ınıza .

SFX 888 N 1
SFX 888 0 ınızda .

SFX 889 N 1
SFX 889 0 ınızı .

SFX 890 N 1
SFX 890 0 ıyken .

SFX 891 N 1
SFX 891 0 ıymış .

SFX 892 N 1
SFX 892 0 ıysa .

SFX 893 N 1
SFX 893 0 mmış .

SFX 894 N 1
SFX 894 0 ırlarmış .

SFX 895 N 1
SFX 895 0 ıma .

SFX 896 N 1
SFX 896 0 ımızdan .

SFX 897 N 1
SFX 897 0 ınca .

SFX 898 N 1
SFX 898 0 ındaydı .

SFX 899 N 1
SFX 899 0 ındaydık .

SFX 900 N 1
SFX 900 0 ındaydım .

SFX 901 N 1
SFX 901 0 ındayım .

SFX 902 N 1
SFX 902 0 ındayız .

SFX 903 N 1
SFX 903 0 ınım .

SFX 904 N 1
SFX 904 0 ınınsa .

SFX 905 N 1
SFX 905 0 lardayız .

SFX 906 N 1
SFX 906 0 takine .

SFX 907 N 1
SFX 907 0 ıyorduk .

SFX 908 N 1
SFX 908 0 ıyorken .

SFX 909 N 1
SFX 909 0 ıyorlarsa .

SFX 910 N 1
SFX 910 0 ıyormuşçasına .

SFX 911 N 1
SFX 911 0 ıyorsak .

SFX 912 N 1
SFX 912 0 saymış .

SFX 913 N 1
SFX 913 0 yasınız .

SFX 914 N 1
SFX 914 0 mdansa .

SFX 915 N 1
SFX 915 0 mızdaki .

SFX 916 N 1
SFX 916 0 mızdansa .

SFX 917 N 1
SFX 917 0 nızdaki .

SFX 918 N 1
SFX 918 0 sınca .

SFX 919 N 1
SFX 919 0 sındadırlar .

SFX 920 N 1
SFX 920 0 sındandı .

SFX 921 N 1
SFX 921 0 sındandır .

SFX 922 N 1
SFX 922 0 ıyordunuz .

SFX 923 N 1
SFX 923 0 ıyorlarmış .

SFX 924 N 1
SFX 924 0 larımdı .

SFX 925 N 1
SFX 925 0 tasınız .

SFX 926 N 1
SFX 926 0 larıymış .

SFX 927 N 1
SFX 927 0 ydın .

SFX 928 N 1
SFX 928 0 ymışlar .

SFX 929 N 1
SFX 929 0 mdandı .

SFX 930 N 1
SFX 930 0 mışsındır .

SFX 931 N 1
SFX 931 0 yacaksam .

SFX 932 N 1
SFX 932 0 dalar .

SFX 933 N 1
SFX 933 0 dayız .

SFX 934 N 1
SFX 934 0 larca .

SFX 935 N 1
SFX 935 0 salarmış .

SFX 936 N 1
SFX 936 0 saydılar .

SFX 937 N 1
SFX 937 0 tılarsa .

SFX 938 N 1
SFX 938 0 tıysak .

SFX 939 N 1
SFX 939 0 tıysam .

SFX 940 N 1
SFX 940 0 dakilerden .

SFX 941 N 1
SFX 941 0 dakilere .

SFX 942 N 1
SFX 942 0 dakileri .

SFX 943 N 1
SFX 943 0 dakilerin .

SFX 944 N 1
SFX 944 0 dakinin .

SFX 945 N 1
SFX 945 0 dakiyle .

SFX 946 N 1
SFX 946 0 dansınız .

SFX 947 N 1
SFX 947 0 dasınız .

SFX 948 N 1
SFX 948 0 daydık .

SFX 949 N 1
SFX 949 0 daydılar .

SFX 950 N 1
SFX 950 0 daydım .

SFX 951 N 1
SFX 951 0 dayım .

SFX 952 N 1
SFX 952 0 daymış .

SFX 953 N 1
SFX 953 0 daymışım .

SFX 954 N 1
SFX 954 0 adır .

SFX 955 N 1
SFX 955 0 lardakiler .

SFX 956 N 1
SFX 956 0 lardakilerle .

SFX 957 N 1
SFX 957 0 lardakini .

SFX 958 N 1
SFX 958 0 larındakilerde .

SFX 959 N 1
SFX 959 0 larındakilerle .

SFX 960 N 1
SFX 960 0 larındakinin .

SFX 961 N 1
SFX 961 0 larındanım .

SFX 962 N 1
SFX 962 0 larındı .

SFX 963 N 1
SFX 963 0 larınınkine .

SFX 964 N 1
SFX 964 0 mdeki .

SFX 965 N 1
SFX 965 0 edir .

SFX 966 N 1
SFX 966 0 eydi .

SFX 967 N 1
SFX 967 0 ime .

SFX 968 N 1
SFX 968 0 imle .

SFX 969 N 1
SFX 969 0 ince .

SFX 970 N 1
SFX 970 0 indeki .

SFX 971 N 1
SFX 971 0 indeyim .

SFX 972 N 1
SFX 972 0 indir .

SFX 973 N 1
SFX 973 0 inindir .

SFX 974 N 1
SFX 974 0 inizdedir .

SFX 975 N 1
SFX 975 0 inizin .

SFX 976 N 1
SFX 976 0 inizle .

SFX 977 N 1
SFX 977 0 inle .

SFX 978 N 1
SFX 978 0 ydin .

SFX 979 N 1
SFX 979 0 ysen .

SFX 980 N 1
SFX 980 0 tense .

SFX 981 N 1
SFX 981 0 'te .

SFX 982 N 1
SFX 982 0 tendi .

SFX 983 N 1
SFX 983 0 tin .

SFX 984 N 1
SFX 984 0 madır .

SFX 985 N 1
SFX 985 0 larınca .

SFX 986 N 1
SFX 986 0 masın .

SFX 987 N 1
SFX 987 0 maydı .

SFX 988 N 1
SFX 988 0 maydın .

SFX 989 N 1
SFX 989 0 mayım .

SFX 990 N 1
SFX 990 0 mayız .

SFX 991 N 1
SFX 991 0 mca .

SFX 992 N 1
SFX 992 0 mdadır .

SFX 993 N 1
SFX 993 0 mdakinin .

SFX 994 N 1
SFX 994 0 mdandır .

SFX 995 N 1
SFX 995 0 mdaysa .

SFX 996 N 1
SFX 996 0 mdık .

SFX 997 N 1
SFX 997 0 mdılar .

SFX 998 N 1
SFX 998 0 mdım .

SFX 999 N 1
SFX 999 0 mdın .

SFX 1000 N 1
SFX 1000 0 mdınız .

SFX 1001 N 1
SFX 1001 0 mdırlar .

SFX 1002 N 1
SFX 1002 0 mıdırlar .

SFX 1003 N 1
SFX 1003 0 ımdı .

SFX 1004 N 1
SFX 1004 0 ımızdı .

SFX 1005 N 1
SFX 1005 0 ımızdır .

SFX 1006 N 1
SFX 1006 0 ımızınsa .

SFX 1007 N 1
SFX 1007 0 ımızsın .

SFX 1008 N 1
SFX 1008 0 ımla .

SFX 1009 N 1
SFX 1009 0 ımsa .

SFX 1010 N 1
SFX 1010 0 ımsın .

SFX 1011 N 1
SFX 1011 0 ınaysa .
