dictionaries/tr/index.dic
Ermenek/981
kımıl/11,13,20,22,26,51,61,126,174,236,554,775,1829,1830
kusma/12,13,14,15,16,17,18,19,20,23,24,25,26,27,28,29,49,51,53,54,55,73,74,94,95,96,125,126,128,129,131,132,133,134,141,143,149,150,153,174,184,187,191,430,439,442,457,467,594,779
mahmul/778
maymun/11,13,14,15,20,21,22,23,24,25,26,27,28,29,30,31,32,49,50,121,122,123,125,128,141,223,443,524,583,661,662,664,665,743,790,796,834,845,934,963,1067,1103,1108,1109,1110,1111,1112,1114,1116,1177,1340,1419,1608,1628,1899,1900,2530,2804,2889,4193
mezra/12,13,14,15,16,17,18,19,20,21,23,24,25,26,27,28,29,48,49,50,51,53,55,64,122,123,124,125,128,131,132,133,134,136,143,144,146,153,185,188,189,224,452,453,457,488,524,577,783,796,915,955,1522,1707,2093
oğul/13,14,15,20,21,22,23,24,25,26,27,28,29,48,49,50,121,122,123,124,125,128,178,223,224,430,431,432,433,434,435,436,438,439,440,441,442,524,576,580,582,661,662,793,796,802,803,804,831,924,926,1068,1069,1071,1103,1177,1899,2116,2436,2437,2744,3805
orantı/12,13,14,15,16,17,18,19,20,23,24,26,27,28,49,51,125,131,132,133,134,136,144,146,441,782,841,844,949
ölümlü/3,6,8,35,36,37,38,39,41,323,363,365,421,426,768,769,771,772,773,824,1183,1668,1705,1991,1994,1995,1997,2000,4776
öpücü/35,38,41,335,770,1703,1704
özgü/9999,2,3,6,8,35,37,38,39,53,54,323,402,426,507,768,769,770,771,1489,1677,1698,1699,1870,1994,1996,2000,3007,3502,3716,3745,3746,3802,4387
pişmansı/53,184,810,859
prodüksiyon/11,13,14,15,20,21,22,23,24,25,26,27,28,29,30,31,32,48,49,50,59,121,123,125,128,433,437,441,661,662,664,665,784,796,1102,1103,1108,1109,1110,1111,1113,1114,1116,1419,2517,2530,2769
prodüktör/9999,3,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,41,44,45,46,47,255,326,329,331,332,333,335,339,363,371,494,501,768,774,776,777,1118,1119,1120,1122,1652,1653,1654,1671,1676,1680,1682,1683,1689,1690,1797,2002,2228
püskürtücü/35,37,38,39,41,770,771
raportör/9999,3,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,41,44,45,46,47,255,331,333,335,336,339,363,377,777,1118,1119,1120,1621,1653,1654,1681,1682,2002
somon/11,13,14,15,20,22,23,24,25,26,27,30,31,32,48,524,661,665,789,1102,1110,1116,1177
şut/11,14,15,22,23,24,25,26,27,28,29,30,31,32,48,49,50,52,59,91,123,125,128,178,428,430,431,432,433,434,439,440,441,469,514,515,524,576,577,664,665,791,796,835,845,1103,1106,1107,1108,1110,1111,1112,1113,1114,1116,1339,1340,1419,1420,1626,2148,2149,2769,4238
şükür/9999,2,3,34,35,36,37,38,39,41,256,374,768,776,1233
tanıdık/14,15,22,23,24,25,26,27,28,29,48,49,50,52,74,92,121,123,124,125,128,141,163,178,211,223,224,430,431,432,433,434,435,436,437,438,439,440,441,442,576,577,582,592,794,798,802,803,804,924,926,1071,1368,6296
tanımlamak/22,52,91,92,140,141,163,177,589,734,786,787,2015
taşınmak/22,52,91,92,140,141,163,177,428,589,734,786,787
tattır/58,60,61,71,74,75,76,77,78,84,85,86,87,88,93,94,102,113,114,118,126,127,129,141,155,156,157,159,174,175,176,557,558,559,620,780,923
türkücü/3,6,8,35,36,37,38,39,41,329,333,334,335,336,365,374,768,769,770,771,772,1356,1694,1696,1703,1704,1705,1993,1994,2000,2123,2892,2893,2895,3976
ütücü/9999,6,8,35,37,38,39,769,770,1705,1997
yargıç/14,15,22,23,24,25,26,27,28,29,48,49,50,52,59,74,91,92,117,121,122,123,124,125,128,141,163,178,212,214,223,224,428,430,431,433,435,436,437,439,441,524,577,581,583,592,788,834,845,934,985,1058,1071,1782,5893
yıkama/12,13,14,15,17,18,19,20,21,23,24,25,26,27,28,49,50,51,54,56,73,74,93,94,95,96,102,125,126,127,128,129,131,132,133,134,141,142,144,146,149,150,152,153,174,175,176,183,184,187,188,191,193,195,196,197,199,200,201,202,204,454,457,466,467,511,556,563,564,565,566,567,596,597,598,599,741,742,781,810
yumurta/12,13,14,15,16,17,18,19,20,21,23,24,25,26,27,28,29,48,49,50,51,53,54,56,59,70,89,121,122,123,125,128,131,132,133,134,136,137,139,143,144,145,146,153,183,184,191,224,430,435,437,439,441,442,457,466,467,487,488,507,524,782,785,796,802,835,926,944,945,3961
yurt/14,15,22,23,24,25,26,27,28,29,48,49,50,52,59,91,121,122,123,124,125,128,178,224,428,435,436,437,439,440,441,511,514,515,524,576,577,582,585,625,787,792,796,798,799,800,831,833,860,866,877,905,1177,1398,1772,2783,3687
